Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-1107
Process for selecting design-builder and entering into contract.

The process for selecting a design-builder and entering into a design-build contract shall be in accordance with sections 73-1108 to 73-1111.

Laws 2025, LB660, § 7.